Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.186

Voluntary substance abuse monitoring program—Content—License surcharge.

(1) To implement a substance abuse monitoring program for license holders specified under RCW 18.130.040, who are impaired by substance abuse, the disciplinary [disciplining] authority may enter into a contract with a voluntary substance abuse program under RCW 18.130.175. The program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired license holders to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired license holders including those ordered by the disciplinary [disciplining] authority;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired license holders; and

(g) Performing other activities as agreed upon by the disciplinary [disciplining] authority.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section may be financed by a surcharge on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department of health from the license holders of the same regulated health profession. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the program.

[ 1993 c 367 s 9; 1989 c 125 s 3.]